Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-209 Assessments. (a) For the purpose of providing the funds necessary to
carry out the powers and duties of the association, the board of directors
shall assess the member insurers, separately for each account, at such time and
for such amounts as the board finds necessary. Assessments shall be due not
less than thirty days after prior written notice to the member insurers and
shall accrue interest at eighteen per cent per annum on and after the due date.

(b) There shall be two assessments, as
follows:

(1) Class A assessments
shall be authorized and called for the purpose of meeting administrative and
legal costs, and other expenses and examinations conducted under the authority
of section 431:16‑212(e).
Class A assessments may be authorized and called
whether or not related to a particular impaired or insolvent insurer.

(2) Class B assessments
shall be authorized and called to the extent necessary to carry out the powers
and duties of the association under section 431:16-208 with regard to an impaired or an insolvent insurer.

(c)(1) The amount of any Class
A assessment shall be determined by the board of directors and may be
authorized and called on a pro rata or non-pro rata basis. If pro rata, the
board of directors may provide that it be credited against future Class B
assessments. A non-pro rata assessment shall not exceed $300 per member
insurer in any one calendar year. The amount of any Class B assessment shall
be allocated for assessment purposes among the accounts pursuant to an
allocation formula which may be based on the premiums or reserves of the
impaired or insolvent insurer or any other standard deemed by the board of
directors in its sole discretion as being fair and reasonable under the circumstances.

(2) Class B assessments
against member insurers for each account shall be in the proportion that the
premiums received on business in this State by each assessed member insurer on
policies or contracts covered by each account for the three most recent
calendar years for which information is available preceding the year in which
the insurer became impaired or insolvent, as the case may be, bears to the
premiums received on business in this State for the calendar years by all
assessed member insurers.

(3) Assessments for funds
to meet the requirements of the association with respect to an impaired or
insolvent insurer shall not be authorized or called until necessary to
implement the purposes of this part. Classification of assessments under
subsection (b) and computation of assessments under this subsection shall be
made with a reasonable degree of accuracy, recognizing that exact
determinations may not always be possible. The association shall notify each
member insurer of its anticipated pro rata share of an authorized assessment
not yet called within one hundred eighty days after the assessment is
authorized.

(d) The association may abate or defer, in
whole or in part, the assessment of a member insurer if, in the opinion of the
board of directors, payment of the assessment would endanger the ability of the
member insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations. In the event an
assessment against a member insurer is abated, or deferred in whole or in part,
the amount by which the assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed
against the other member insurers in a manner consistent with the basis for
assessments set forth in this section. Once the conditions that caused the
deferral have been removed or rectified, the member shall pay all assessments
that were deferred pursuant to a repayment plan approved by the association.

(e)(1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2), the
total of all assessments authorized by the association with respect to a member
insurer for each account shall not in any one calendar year exceed two per cent
of the insurer's average premiums received in this State on the policies and
contracts covered by the account during the three calendar years preceding the
year in which the insurer became an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(2) If two or more assessments are authorized in one
calendar year with respect to insurers that become impaired or insolvent in
different calendar years, the average annual premiums for purposes of the
aggregate assessment percentage limitation referenced in this section shall be
equal and limited to the higher of the three-year average annual premiums for
the applicable account as calculated pursuant to this section.

(3) If the maximum assessment, together with the
other assets of the association in any account, does not provide in any one
year in either account an amount sufficient to carry out the responsibilities
of the association, the necessary additional funds shall be assessed as soon
thereafter as permitted by this part.

The board of directors may provide in the plan
of operation a method of allocating funds among claims, whether relating to one
or more impaired or insolvent insurers, when the maximum assessment will be
insufficient to cover anticipated claims.

(f) The board may, by an equitable method as
established in the plan of operation, refund to member insurers, in proportion
to the contribution of each insurer to that account, the amount by which the
assets of the account exceed the amount the board finds is necessary to carry
out during the coming year the obligations of the association with regard to
that account, including assets accruing from assignment, subrogation, net
realized gains, and income from investments. A reasonable amount may be
retained in any account to provide funds for the continuing expenses of the
association and for future losses and claims.

(g) It shall be proper for any member insurer,
in determining its premium rates and policy owner dividends as to any kind of
insurance within the scope of this part, to consider the amount reasonably
necessary to meet its assessment obligations under this part.

(h) The association shall issue to each
insurer paying an assessment under this part, other than a Class A assessment,
a certificate of contribution, in a form prescribed by the commissioner, for
the amount of the assessment so paid. All outstanding certificates shall be of
equal dignity and priority without reference to amounts or dates of issue. A
certificate of contribution may be shown by the insurer in its financial
statement as an asset in such form and for such amount, if any, and period of
time as the commissioner may approve.

(i)(1) A member insurer that wishes to protest all or
part of an assessment shall pay when due the full amount of the assessment as
set forth in the notice provided by the association. The payment shall be
available to meet association obligations during the pendency of the protest or
any subsequent appeal. Payment shall be accompanied by a statement in writing
that the payment is made under protest and setting forth a brief statement of
the grounds for the protest.

(2) Within sixty days following the payment of an
assessment under protest by a member insurer, the association shall notify the
member insurer in writing of its determination with respect to the protest,
unless the association notifies the member insurer that additional time is
required to resolve the issues raised by the protest.

(3) Within thirty days after a final decision has
been made, the association shall notify the protesting member insurer in
writing of the final decision. Within sixty days of receipt of notice of the
final decision, the protesting member insurer may appeal the final decision to
the commissioner.

(4) In the alternative to rendering a final decision
with respect to a protest based on a question regarding the assessment base,
the association may refer protests to the commissioner for a final decision
with or without a recommendation from the association.

(5) If the protest or appeal on the assessment is
upheld, the amount paid in error or excess shall be returned to the member
company. Interest on a refund due a protesting member shall be paid at the
rate actually earned by the association.

(j) The association may request information of
member insurers to aid in the exercise of its powers under this section and
member insurers shall promptly comply with any request. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2; am L 2012, c 250, §8]

Note

The 2012 amendment shall not apply to any proceedings in
which a member insurer is placed under an order of liquidation prior to July 1,
2012. L 2012, c 250, §15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next